North Carolina statutes. Chapter 65. Cemeteries.
Article 5. Removal of Graves. [Repealed]

§ 65-13.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-118, s. 4, effective July 1, 2007, and applicable to all trusts created on or after that date.

Cross References.

For similar current provisions, see

G.S. 65-106

.

§§ 65-14,
65-15.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 797, s. 2.